Utah statutes.
4-5-20.   Food designated as raw honey.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Honey" means the natural sweet substance produced by honeybees from nectar of plants or from secretions of living parts of plants that the bees collect, transform by combining with specific substances of their own, then deposit, dehydrate, store, and leave in the honeycomb to ripen and mature.

(b)  "Raw honey" means honey:

(i)  as it exists in the beehive or as obtained by extraction, settling, or straining;

(ii)  that is minimally processed; and

(iii)  that is not pasteurized.

(2)  Honey that is produced, packed, repacked, distributed, or sold in this state may only be labeled and designated as raw honey if it meets:

(a)  the definition of raw honey in this section; and

(b)  any additional requirements imposed by the department by rule.

(3)  The department shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish labeling requirements consistent with the provisions of this section.

